Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
VOTING TRUSTS AND AGREEMENTS

7-107-301. Voting trusts.

One or more shareholders may create a voting trust, conferring on a trustee the right to vote or otherwise act for them, by signing an agreement setting out the provisions of the trust and by transferring their shares to the trustee. When a voting trust agreement is signed, the trustee shall prepare a list of the names and addresses of all owners of beneficial interests in the trust, together with the number and class of shares each transferred to the trust, and promptly cause the corporation to receive copies of the list and agreement. Thereafter, the trustee shall cause the corporation to receive changes to the list promptly as they occur and amendments to the agreement promptly as they are made.

A voting trust becomes effective on the date the first shares subject to the trust are registered in the trustee's name. A voting trust is valid for not more than ten years after its effective date unless extended under subsection (3) of this section.

All or some of the parties to a voting trust may extend it for additional terms of not more than ten years each by signing an extension agreement and obtaining the trustee's written consent to the extension. An extension is valid for not more than ten years after the date the first shareholder signs the extension agreement, unless such signing occurs within two years before the expiration date of the voting trust as originally fixed or as last extended, in which case the extension is valid for not more than ten years after the expiration date of the voting trust as originally fixed or last extended. The trustee shall cause the corporation to receive copies of the extension agreement. An extension agreement binds only those parties signing it.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 776, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-107-302. Voting agreements.

Two or more shareholders may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by signing an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section is not subject to the provisions of section 7-107-301.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 777, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.